Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,223
Award; acceptance; effect.

Any award made under the State Tort Claims Act and accepted by the claimant shall be final and conclusive on all officers of the State of Nebraska except when procured by means of fraud. The acceptance by the claimant of such award shall be final and conclusive on the claimant and shall constitute a complete release by the claimant of any claim against the state and against the employee of the state whose act or omission gave rise to the claim by reason of the same subject matter.

Laws 1969, c. 756, § 15, p. 2850;

Laws 1988, LB 864, § 34.